New York, session 2025-2026, A6225.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision (b) of section 1180-b of the vehicle and traf- 2 fic law, as added by chapter 189 of the laws of 2013, is amended to read 3 as follows: 4 (b) If the city of New York establishes a demonstration program pursu- 5 ant to subdivision (a) of this section, the owner of a vehicle shall be 6 liable for a penalty imposed pursuant to this section if such vehicle 7 was used or operated with the permission of the owner, express or 8 implied, within a school speed zone in violation of subdivision (c) or 9 during the times authorized pursuant to subdivision (a) of this section 10 in violation of subdivision (b), (d), (f) or (g) of section eleven 11 hundred eighty of this article, such vehicle was traveling at a speed of 12 more than [ten] seven miles per hour above the posted speed limit in 13 effect within such school speed zone, and such violation is evidenced by 14 information obtained from a photo speed violation monitoring system; 15 provided however that no owner of a vehicle shall be liable for a penal- 16 ty imposed pursuant to this section where the operator of such vehicle 17 has been convicted of the underlying violation of subdivision (b), (c), 18 (d), (f) or (g) of section eleven hundred eighty of this article. 19 § 2. Paragraphs 6 and 7 of subdivision (n) of section 1180-b of the 20 vehicle and traffic law, as amended by chapter 30 of the laws of 2019, 21 are amended to read as follows: 22 6. the number of violations recorded within all school speed zones 23 within the city that were: EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06600-01-5 A. 6225 2 1 (i) more than [ten] seven but not more than twenty miles per hour over 2 the posted speed limit; 3 (ii) more than twenty but not more than thirty miles per hour over the 4 posted speed limit; 5 (iii) more than thirty but not more than forty miles per hour over the 6 posted speed limit; and 7 (iv) more than forty miles per hour over the posted speed limit; 8 7. the number of violations recorded within each school speed zone 9 where a photo speed violation monitoring system is used that were: 10 (i) more than [ten] seven but not more than twenty miles per hour over 11 the posted speed limit; 12 (ii) more than twenty but not more than thirty miles per hour over the 13 posted speed limit; 14 (iii) more than thirty but not more than forty miles per hour over the 15 posted speed limit; and 16 (iv) more than forty miles per hour over the posted speed limit; 17 § 3. This act shall take effect on the sixtieth day after it shall 18 have become a law; provided that the amendments to section 1180-b of the 19 vehicle and traffic law made by sections one and two of this act shall 20 not affect the repeal of such section and shall be deemed repealed ther- 21 ewith.